Maine, session 132, LD629.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
DEVELOPMENT FOUNDATION, MAINE
Development Foundation 0198
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds to restore matching funds for private contributions to
support the foundation's economic, workforce and community development initiatives
across the State, particularly in distressed communities and industries.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $500,000 $500,000